Idaho statutes. Title 53 PARTNERSHIP
Chapter 7
UNIFORM UNINCORPORATED NONPROFIT ASSOCIATION ACT

Sec.

§ 53-701. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-102.

§ 53-702. Supplementary general principles of law and equity. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-702.

§ 53-703. Territorial application. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 53-704. Real and personal property

Nonprofit association as legatee, devisee or beneficiary. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-106.

§ 53-705. Statement of authority as to real property. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-107.

§ 53-706. Liability in contract and tort. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-108.

§ 53-707. Capacity to assert and defend

Standing. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-109.

§ 53-708. Effect of judgment or order. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-110.

§ 53-709. Disposition of personal property of inactive nonprofit association. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 53-710. Appointment of agent to receive service of process. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-129.

§ 53-711. Claim not abated by change of members or officers. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-112.

§ 53-712. Venue. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-113.

§ 53-713. Uniformity of application and construction. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-703.

§ 53-714. Short title. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-101.

§ 53-715. Effect of chapter upon other laws. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-103.

§ 53-716. Transition concerning real and personal property. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-27-130.

§ 53-717. Savings clause. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 4, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-705.